tests/epenthetic.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] epenthetic vowel surfaces in some verbforms":
    гар<v><iv><aor><neg> : гарахгүй
    бол<v><iv><aor><neg> : болохгүй
    гар<v><iv><ger><nom> : гарах
    бол<v><iv><ger><nom> : болох
    яв<v><iv><ger><nom> : явах
    ир<v><iv><ger><nom> : ирэх
    ид<v><tv><gna> : идэж
    сан<v><tv><gna> : санаж

 "[twol] epenthetic vowel doesn't surface in some verbforms":
    гар<v><iv><gna> : гарч
    бол<v><iv><gna> : болж
    ир<v><iv><gna> : ирж
    яв<v><iv><gna> : явж
    ярь<v><iv><gna> : ярьж
    тавь<v><tv><gna> : тавьж
    боль<v><tv><gna> : больж
    барь<v><tv><gna> : барьж
    хий<v><tv><gna> : хийж
    хий<v><tv><ger><nom> : хийх

 "[twol] epenthetic vowel surfaces as и in some verbforms after palatal cons":
    ярь<v><iv><ger><nom> : ярих
    тавь<v><tv><ger><nom> : тавих
    боль<v><tv><ger><nom> : болих
    барь<v><tv><ger><nom> : барих
    оч<v><iv><ger><nom> : очих
    шинж<v><iv><ger><nom> : шинжих
    оч<v><iv><gna> : очиж
